Virginia statutes. Title 16.1. Courts Not of Record.
Article 5. Intake, Petition and Notice.

§ 16.1-259.
Procedure in cases of adults.

In cases where an adult is charged with violations of the criminal law pursuant to subsection I or J of §

16.1-241

, the procedure and disposition applicable in the trial of such cases in general district court shall be applicable to trial in juvenile court. The provisions of this law shall govern in all other cases involving adults.

Proceedings in cases of adults may be instituted on petition by any interested party, or on a warrant issued as provided by law, or upon the court’s own motion.

Proceedings in cases of adults under the age of 21 who are alleged to have committed, before attaining the age of 18, an offense that would be a crime if committed by an adult shall be commenced by the filing of a petition.

Proceedings for violations of probation or parole in cases of adults under the age of 21 where jurisdiction is retained pursuant to §

16.1-242

shall be commenced by the filing of a petition.

History.

Code 1950, § 16.1-186; 1956, c. 555; 1977, c. 559; 1986, c. 95; 2016, c. 626.

Cross references.

For provision on amendment of written pleadings, see Rule 8:8, Juvenile and Domestic Relations District Court Rules.

Editor’s note.

In subsection A, “subsection I or J” was substituted for “subdivisions I or J” at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 2, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 4, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “if state funds are provided, including all local costs, to carry out the purposes of this bill by the General Assembly.” The funding was not provided.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 626 added subsections C and D.

Law Review.

For article, “The Revision of Virginia’s Juvenile Court Law,” see 13 U. Rich. L. Rev. 847 (1979).

For annual survey article on legal issues involving children, see 38 U. Rich. L. Rev. 161 (2003).

For 2003/2004 survey of family and juvenile law, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 241 (2004).

§ 16.1-260.
Intake; petition; investigation.

All matters alleged to be within the jurisdiction of the court shall be commenced by the filing of a petition, except as provided in subsection H and in §

16.1-259

. The form and content of the petition shall be as provided in §

16.1-262

. No individual shall be required to obtain support services from the Department of Social Services prior to filing a petition seeking support for a child. Complaints, requests, and the processing of petitions to initiate a case shall be the responsibility of the intake officer. However, (i) the attorney for the Commonwealth of the city or county may file a petition on his own motion with the clerk; (ii) designated nonattorney employees of the Department of Social Services may complete, sign, and file petitions and motions relating to the establishment, modification, or enforcement of support on forms approved by the Supreme Court of Virginia with the clerk; (iii) designated nonattorney employees of a local department of social services may complete, sign, and file with the clerk, on forms approved by the Supreme Court of Virginia, petitions for foster care review, petitions for permanency planning hearings, petitions to establish paternity, motions to establish or modify support, motions to amend or review an order, and motions for a rule to show cause; and (iv) any attorney may file petitions on behalf of his client with the clerk except petitions alleging that the subject of the petition is a child alleged to be in need of services, in need of supervision, or delinquent. Complaints alleging abuse or neglect of a child shall be referred initially to the local department of social services in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 15 (§

63.2-1500

et seq.) of Title 63.2. Motions and other subsequent pleadings in a case shall be filed directly with the clerk. The intake officer or clerk with whom the petition or motion is filed shall inquire whether the petitioner is receiving child support services or public assistance. No individual who is receiving support services or public assistance shall be denied the right to file a petition or motion to establish, modify, or enforce an order for support of a child. If the petitioner is seeking or receiving child support services or public assistance, the clerk, upon issuance of process, shall forward a copy of the petition or motion, together with notice of the court date, to the Division of Child Support Enforcement. If a petitioner is seeking to establish child support, the intake officer shall provide the petitioner information on the possible availability of medical assistance through the Family Access to Medical Insurance Security (FAMIS) plan or other government-sponsored coverage through the Department of Medical Assistance Services.

The appearance of a child before an intake officer may be by (i) personal appearance before the intake officer or (ii) use of two-way electronic video and audio communication. If two-way electronic video and audio communication is used, an intake officer may exercise all powers conferred by law. All communications and proceedings shall be conducted in the same manner as if the appearance were in person, and any documents filed may be transmitted by facsimile process. The facsimile may be served or executed by the officer or person to whom sent, and returned in the same manner, and with the same force, effect, authority, and liability as an original document. All signatures thereon shall be treated as original signatures. Any two-way electronic video and audio communication system used for an appearance shall meet the standards as set forth in subsection B of §

19.2-3.1

.When the court service unit of any court receives a complaint alleging facts which may be sufficient to invoke the jurisdiction of the court pursuant to §

16.1-241

, the unit, through an intake officer, may proceed informally to make such adjustment as is practicable without the filing of a petition or may authorize a petition to be filed by any complainant having sufficient knowledge of the matter to establish probable cause for the issuance of the petition.An intake officer may proceed informally on a complaint alleging a child is in need of services, in need of supervision, or delinquent only if the juvenile (a) is not alleged to have committed a violent juvenile felony or (b) has not previously been proceeded against informally or adjudicated delinquent for an offense that would be a felony if committed by an adult. A petition alleging that a juvenile committed a violent juvenile felony shall be filed with the court. A petition alleging that a juvenile is delinquent for an offense that would be a felony if committed by an adult shall be filed with the court if the juvenile had previously been proceeded against informally by intake or had been adjudicated delinquent for an offense that would be a felony if committed by an adult.If a juvenile is alleged to be a truant pursuant to a complaint filed in accordance with § 22.1-258 and the attendance officer has provided documentation to the intake officer that the relevant school division has complied with the provisions of § 22.1-258, then the intake officer shall file a petition with the court. The intake officer may defer filing the petition and proceed informally by developing a truancy plan, provided that (1) the juvenile has not previously been proceeded against informally or adjudicated in need of supervision on more than two occasions for failure to comply with compulsory school attendance as provided in § 22.1-254 and (2) the immediately previous informal action or adjudication occurred at least three calendar years prior to the current complaint. The juvenile and his parent or parents, guardian, or other person standing in loco parentis must agree, in writing, for the development of a truancy plan. The truancy plan may include requirements that the juvenile and his parent or parents, guardian, or other person standing in loco parentis participate in such programs, cooperate in such treatment, or be subject to such conditions and limitations as necessary to ensure the juvenile’s compliance with compulsory school attendance as provided in § 22.1-254. The intake officer may refer the juvenile to the appropriate public agency for the purpose of developing a truancy plan using an interagency interdisciplinary team approach. The team may include qualified personnel who are reasonably available from the appropriate department of social services, community services board, local school division, court service unit, and other appropriate and available public and private agencies and may be the family assessment and planning team established pursuant to §

2.2-5207

. If at the end of the deferral period the juvenile has not successfully completed the truancy plan or the truancy program, then the intake officer shall file the petition.Whenever informal action is taken as provided in this subsection on a complaint alleging that a child is in need of services, in need of supervision, or delinquent, the intake officer shall (A) develop a plan for the juvenile, which may include restitution, the performance of community service, or on a complaint alleging that a child has committed a delinquent act other than an act that would be a felony or a Class 1 misdemeanor if committed by an adult and with the consent of the juvenile’s parent or legal guardian, referral to a youth justice diversion program established pursuant to §

16.1-309.11

, based upon community resources and the circumstances which resulted in the complaint, (B) create an official record of the action taken by the intake officer and file such record in the juvenile’s case file, and (C) advise the juvenile and the juvenile’s parent, guardian, or other person standing in loco parentis and the complainant that any subsequent complaint alleging that the child is in need of supervision or delinquent based upon facts which may be sufficient to invoke the jurisdiction of the court pursuant to §

16.1-241

, or in the case of a referral to a youth justice diversion program established pursuant to §

16.1-309.11

, that any subsequent report from the youth justice diversion program alleging that the juvenile failed to comply with the youth justice diversion program’s sentence within 180 days of the sentencing date, may result in the filing of a petition with the court.

The intake officer shall accept and file a petition in which it is alleged that (i) the custody, visitation, or support of a child is the subject of controversy or requires determination, (ii) a person has deserted, abandoned, or failed to provide support for any person in violation of law, (iii) a child or such child’s parent, guardian, legal custodian, or other person standing in loco parentis is entitled to treatment, rehabilitation, or other services which are required by law, (iv) family abuse has occurred and a protective order is being sought pursuant to §

16.1-253.1

,

16.1-253.4

, or

16.1-279.1

, or (v) an act of violence, force, or threat has occurred, a protective order is being sought pursuant to §

19.2-152.8

,

19.2-152.9

, or

19.2-152.10

, and either the alleged victim or the respondent is a juvenile. If any such complainant does not file a petition, the intake officer may file it. In cases in which a child is alleged to be abused, neglected, in need of services, in need of supervision, or delinquent, if the intake officer believes that probable cause does not exist, or that the authorization of a petition will not be in the best interest of the family or juvenile or that the matter may be effectively dealt with by some agency other than the court, he may refuse to authorize the filing of a petition. The intake officer shall provide to a person seeking a protective order pursuant to §

16.1-253.1

,

16.1-253.4

, or

16.1-279.1

a written explanation of the conditions, procedures and time limits applicable to the issuance of protective orders pursuant to § 16.1-253.1, 16.1-253.4, or

16.1-279.1

. If the person is seeking a protective order pursuant to §

19.2-152.8

,

19.2-152.9

, or

19.2-152.10

, the intake officer shall provide a written explanation of the conditions, procedures, and time limits applicable to the issuance of protective orders pursuant to § 19.2-152.8, 19.2-152.9, or 19.2-152.10.

Prior to the filing of any petition alleging that a child is in need of supervision, the matter shall be reviewed by an intake officer who shall determine whether the petitioner and the child alleged to be in need of supervision have utilized or attempted to utilize treatment and services available in the community and have exhausted all appropriate nonjudicial remedies which are available to them. When the intake officer determines that the parties have not attempted to utilize available treatment or services or have not exhausted all appropriate nonjudicial remedies which are available, he shall refer the petitioner and the child alleged to be in need of supervision to the appropriate agency, treatment facility, or individual to receive treatment or services, and a petition shall not be filed. Only after the intake officer determines that the parties have made a reasonable effort to utilize available community treatment or services may he permit the petition to be filed.

If the intake officer refuses to authorize a petition relating to an offense that if committed by an adult would be punishable as a Class 1 misdemeanor or as a felony, when such refusal is based solely upon a finding that no probable cause exists, the complainant shall be notified in writing at that time of the complainant’s right to apply to a magistrate for a warrant. The application for a warrant to the magistrate shall be filed within 10 days of the issuance of the written notification. The written notification shall indicate that the intake officer made a finding that no probable cause exists and shall provide notice that the complainant has 10 days to apply for a warrant to the magistrate. The complainant shall provide the magistrate with a copy of the written notification upon application to the magistrate. If a magistrate determines that probable cause exists, he shall issue a warrant returnable to the juvenile and domestic relations district court. The warrant shall be delivered forthwith to the juvenile court, and the intake officer shall accept and file a petition founded upon the warrant. If the court is closed and the magistrate finds that the criteria for detention or shelter care set forth in §

16.1-248.1

have been satisfied, the juvenile may be detained pursuant to the warrant issued in accordance with this subsection. If the intake officer refuses to authorize a petition relating to a child in need of services or in need of supervision, a status offense, or a misdemeanor other than Class 1, his decision is final. If the intake officer refuses to authorize a petition relating to an offense that if committed by an adult would be punishable as a Class 1 misdemeanor or as a felony when such refusal is based upon a finding that (i) probable cause exists, but that (ii) the matter is appropriate for diversion, his decision is final and the complainant shall not have a right to apply to a magistrate for a warrant.Upon delivery to the juvenile court of a warrant issued pursuant to subdivision 2 of §

16.1-256

, the intake officer shall accept and file a petition founded upon the warrant.

The intake officer shall notify the attorney for the Commonwealth of the filing of any petition which alleges facts of an offense which would be a felony if committed by an adult.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Article 12 (§

16.1-299

et seq.), the intake officer shall file a report with the division superintendent of the school division in which any student who is the subject of a petition alleging that such student who is a juvenile has committed an act, wherever committed, which would be a crime if committed by an adult, or that such student who is an adult has committed a crime and is alleged to be within the jurisdiction of the court. The report shall notify the division superintendent of the filing of the petition and the nature of the offense, if the violation involves:

A firearm offense pursuant to Article 4 (§

18.2-279

et seq.), 5 (§

18.2-288

et seq.), 6 (§

18.2-299

et seq.), 6.1 (§

18.2-307.1

et seq.), or 7 (§

18.2-308.1

et seq.) of Chapter 7 of Title 18.2;

Homicide, pursuant to Article 1 (§

18.2-30

et seq.) of Chapter 4 of Title 18.2;

Felonious assault and bodily wounding, pursuant to Article 4 (§

18.2-51

et seq.) of Chapter 4 of Title 18.2;

Criminal sexual assault, pursuant to Article 7 (§

18.2-61

et seq.) of Chapter 4 of Title 18.2;

Manufacture, sale, gift, distribution or possession of Schedule I or II controlled substances, pursuant to Article 1 (§

18.2-247

et seq.) of Chapter 7 of Title 18.2;

Manufacture, sale or distribution of marijuana pursuant to Article 1 (§

18.2-247

et seq.) of Chapter 7 of Title 18.2;

Arson and related crimes, pursuant to Article 1 (§

18.2-77

et seq.) of Chapter 5 of Title 18.2;

Burglary and related offenses, pursuant to §§

18.2-89

through

18.2-93

;

Robbery pursuant to §

18.2-58

;

Prohibited criminal street gang activity pursuant to §

18.2-46.2

;

Recruitment of other juveniles for a criminal street gang activity pursuant to §

18.2-46.3

;

An act of violence by a mob pursuant to §

18.2-42.1

;

Abduction of any person pursuant to §

18.2-47

or

18.2-48

; or

A threat pursuant to §

18.2-60

.The failure to provide information regarding the school in which the student who is the subject of the petition may be enrolled shall not be grounds for refusing to file a petition.The information provided to a division superintendent pursuant to this section may be disclosed only as provided in §

16.1-305.2

.

The filing of a petition shall not be necessary:

In the case of violations of the traffic laws, including offenses involving bicycles, hitchhiking and other pedestrian offenses, game and fish laws, or a violation of the ordinance of any city regulating surfing or any ordinance establishing curfew violations, animal control violations, or littering violations. In such cases the court may proceed on a summons issued by the officer investigating the violation in the same manner as provided by law for adults. Additionally, an officer investigating a motor vehicle accident may, at the scene of the accident or at any other location where a juvenile who is involved in such an accident may be located, proceed on a summons in lieu of filing a petition.

In the case of seeking consent to apply for the issuance of a work permit pursuant to subsection H of §

16.1-241

.

In the case of a misdemeanor violation of §

18.2-266

,

18.2-266.1

, or

29.1-738

or the commission of any other alcohol-related offense, provided that the juvenile is released to the custody of a parent or legal guardian pending the initial court date. The officer releasing a juvenile to the custody of a parent or legal guardian shall issue a summons to the juvenile and shall also issue a summons requiring the parent or legal guardian to appear before the court with the juvenile. Disposition of the charge shall be in the manner provided in §

16.1-278.8

,

16.1-278.8:01

, or

16.1-278.9

. If the juvenile so charged with a violation of §

18.2-51.4

,

18.2-266

,

18.2-266.1

,

18.2-272

, or

29.1-738

refuses to provide a sample of blood or breath or samples of both blood and breath for chemical analysis pursuant to §§

18.2-268.1

through

18.2-268.12

or

29.1-738.2

, the provisions of these sections shall be followed except that the magistrate shall authorize execution of the warrant as a summons. The summons shall be served on a parent or legal guardian and the juvenile, and a copy of the summons shall be forwarded to the court in which the violation is to be tried. When a violation of §

4.1-305

is charged by summons, the juvenile shall be entitled to have the charge referred to intake for consideration of informal proceedings pursuant to subsection B, provided that such right is exercised by written notification to the clerk not later than 10 days prior to trial. At the time such summons alleging a violation of §

4.1-305

is served, the officer shall also serve upon the juvenile written notice of the right to have the charge referred to intake on a form approved by the Supreme Court and make return of such service to the court. If the officer fails to make such service or return, the court shall dismiss the summons without prejudice.

In the case of offenses which, if committed by an adult, would be punishable as a Class 3 or Class 4 misdemeanor. In such cases the court may direct that an intake officer proceed as provided in §

16.1-237

on a summons issued by the officer investigating the violation in the same manner as provided by law for adults provided that notice of the summons to appear is mailed by the investigating officer within five days of the issuance of the summons to a parent or legal guardian of the juvenile.

Failure to comply with the procedures set forth in this section shall not divest the juvenile court of the jurisdiction granted it in §

16.1-241

.

History.

Code 1950, § 16.1-164; 1956, c. 555; 1972, cc. 672, 835; 1973, c. 440; 1977, c. 559; 1979, c. 701; 1982, c. 91; 1983, c. 349; 1985, c. 488; 1986, c. 381; 1987, cc. 203, 632; 1988, cc. 792, 803; 1990, c. 742; 1991, cc. 496, 511, 534; 1992, cc. 502, 527, 542; 1993, c. 981; 1995, cc. 347, 429; 1996, cc. 755, 914; 1997, c. 862; 1999, cc. 54, 526, 952; 2002, c. 747; 2003, c. 587; 2004, cc. 105, 255, 309, 416, 517, 558; 2006, c. 677; 2008, cc. 136, 845; 2009, cc. 385, 726; 2010, c. 742; 2011, cc. 384, 410, 825; 2012, c. 637; 2013, c. 746; 2014, cc. 674, 719; 2016, c. 704; 2018, cc. 281, 312; 2019, cc. 106, 206; 2020, cc. 753, 1285, 1286; 2021 Sp. Sess. I, cc. 30, 206, 457, 550, 551.

Cross references.

As to the provision of court services and replacement intake officers, see §

16.1-235.1

.

As to punishment for Class 3 and Class 4 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 1, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 3, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “only if state funds are provided by the General Assembly sufficient to provide adequate resources, including all local costs, for the court to carry out the purposes of this act and to fulfill its mission to serve children and families of the Commonwealth.” The funding was not provided.

Acts 2008, cc. 136 and 845, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act amending subsection A of §

16.1-260

and the provisions of this act amending §

54.1-3900

are declarative of existing law.”

Acts 2013, c. 746, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act are declaratory of existing law.”

Acts 2014, cc. 674 and 719, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is at least $66,663 for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

Acts 2016, c. 704, cl. 2 provides: “That nothing in this bill shall be construed to invalidate prior filings or petitions by local departments of social services or by their employees on behalf of the local department prior to July 1, 2016.”’

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and 551, cl. 7 provides: “That, except for (i) the provisions of Article 29 (§

2.2-2499.1

et seq.) of Chapter 24 of Title 2.2 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, §§

4.1-600

through

4.1-628

,

4.1-1100

,

4.1-1101

,

4.1-1101.1

,

4.1-1105.1

,

4.1-1107

through

4.1-1110

,

4.1-1112

,

4.1-1120

,

4.1-1121

, and

4.1-1302

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, Chapter 15 (§

4.1-1500

et seq.) of Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, §§

15.2-1627

,

16.1-69.48:1

,

16.1-228

,

16.1-278.8:01

,

18.2-251.02

,

18.2-308.09

,

18.2-308.1:5

,

19.2-389.3

,

19.2-392.1

,

19.2-392.4

, and

24.2-233

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, §§

19.2-392.2:1

,

19.2-392.2:2

, and

46.2-341.20:7

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, and §

54.1-3442.6

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, and (ii) the repeal of §

18.2-250.1

of the Code of Virginia, the provisions of the first, third, fourth, fifth, sixth, and eleventh enactments of this act shall not become effective unless reenacted by the 2022 Session of the General Assembly. The provisions of §§

4.1-1101.1

and

4.1-1105.1

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall expire on January 1, 2024, if the provisions of the first, third, and fourth enactments of this act are reenacted by the 2022 Session of the General Assembly.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and 551, cl. 8 provides: “That (i) the provisions of the second enactment of this act, (ii) the provisions of Article 29 (§

2.2-2499.1

et seq.) of Chapter 24 of Title 2.2 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, §§

4.1-600

through

4.1-628

,

4.1-1100

,

4.1-1101

,

4.1-1101.1

,

4.1-1105.1

,

4.1-1107

through

4.1-1110

,

4.1-1112

,

4.1-1120

,

4.1-1121

, and

4.1-1302

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, Chapter 15 (§

4.1-1500

et seq.) of Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, §§

15.2-1627

,

16.1-69.48:1

,

16.1-228

,

16.1-278.8:01

,

18.2-251.02

,

18.2-308.09

, and

18.2-308.1:5

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, §

46.2-341.20:7

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, and §

54.1-3442.6

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, and (iii) the repeal of §

18.2-250.1

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and 551, cl. 26 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 1289 of the Acts of Assembly of 2020 requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice. The provisions of this enactment shall become effective in due course.”

The 1996 amendments.

The 1996 amendments by cc. 755 and 914 are identical, and, substituted “juvenile” for “child” throughout the section, substituted “subsection H” for “subsection E” in the first sentence of subsection A, added present subsection B, inserted the subdivision B 1 designation, added the second and third paragraphs following subdivision B 1, redesignated former subsections C through G as present subsections D through I, substituted “subsection 2 of §

16.1-256

” for “subsection 3 of §

16.1-256

” near the middle of the second paragraph of present subsection E, and in present subdivision G 8, inserted “and related offenses” following “Burglary” and inserted “through

18.2-93

” following “18.2-89.”

The 1999 amendments.

The 1999 amendment by c. 54, in subsection C, deleted “or” preceding clause (iii), added “or” at the end of clause (iii), and added clause (iv).

The 1999 amendment by c. 526, in subsection B, deleted the subdivision 1 designator from the second paragraph, in the third paragraph, deleted “However” at the beginning of the paragraph, substituted “(ii) has not previously been proceeded against informally or adjudicated in need of supervision or delinquent; or (iii) is not the subject of a complaint filed pursuant to § 22.1-258 and the attendance officer has provided documentation to the intake officer or magistrate that the relevant school division has complied with the provisions of § 22.1-258” for “or (ii) has not previously been adjudicated in need of supervision or delinquent,” and inserted “been proceeded against informally by intake or had” in the last sentence; and deleted “is” preceding “in need of supervision” in the fourth paragraph.

The 1999 amendment by c. 952 rewrote subdivision G 1, which formerly read: “The unlawful purchase, possession or use of a weapon pursuant to Article 4 (§

18.2-279

et seq.) of Chapter 7 of Title 18.2,” and added subdivision G 9.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 747, effective October 1, 2002, in subsection A, deleted “public welfare or” preceding “social services” and substituted “Chapter 15 (§

63.2-1500

et seq.) of Title 63.2” for “Chapter 12.1 (§ 63.1-248.1 et seq.) of Title 63.1” in the fifth sentence.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 587, in subsection B, in the third paragraph, inserted “or” preceding clause (ii), and deleted former clause (iii), which read: “is not the subject of a complaint filed pursuant to § 22.1-258 and the attendance officer has provided documentation to the intake officer or magistrate that the relevant school division has complied with the provisions of § 22.1-258,” and added the present fourth paragraph.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 105 added “or littering violations” at the end of the first sentence in subdivision H 1 and made a stylistic change.

The 2004 amendment by c. 255 added the last sentence in subsection C; and substituted “subsection” for “subdivision” in subdivision H 2.

The 2004 amendment by c. 309, in subsection B, in the third paragraph, substituted “in need of supervision or delinquent” for “delinquent for an offense that would be a felony if committed by an adult” in the first and third sentences, and deleted “in need of supervision of” preceding “delinquent” at the end of the third sentence.

The 2004 amendment by c. 416 added subdivision G 10 and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2004 amendment by c. 517 rewrote the introductory paragraph in subsection G, which
read: “After a petition is filed alleging that a juvenile committed an act, which would be a crime if committed by an adult, the intake officer shall, as soon as practicable, provide notice by telephone of the filing of the petition and the nature of the offense to the superintendent of the school division in which the petitioner alleges the juvenile is or should be enrolled, provided the violation involves:”; inserted subdivisions G 11 and G 12, deleted the former first sentence of the first paragraph after subdivision G 13, which read: “Promptly after filing a petition the intake officer shall also mail notice, by first class mail, to the superintendent”; and substituted “subsection H” for “subdivision H” in subdivision H 2.

The 2004 amendment by c. 558 added subdivisions G 10 and G 13 and made a related change; and substituted “subsection” for “subdivision” in subdivision H 2.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 677, in subdivision H 3, deleted “§” preceding “29.1-738” in the first sentence, in the fourth sentence, inserted “18.2-51.4” and “18.2-266.1,

18.2-272

” and made a minor sylistic change, and deleted “of §

18.2-266

or §

29.1-738

” preceding “is to be tried” in the last sentence.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 136 and 845 are nearly identical, and substituted “designated nonattorney employees of the Department of Social Services may complete, sign and file petitions and motions relating to the establishment, modification, or enforcement of support on forms approved by the Supreme Court of Virginia” for “the Department of Social Services may file support on its own motion” in clause (ii) of subsection A; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 385, in subsection G, deleted former subdivision G 10, which read: “Prohibited street gang participation pursuant to §

18.2-46.2

” and redesignated former subdivisions G 11 through G 13 as subdivisions G 10 and G 12; and substituted “An act of violence by a mob pursuant to §

18.2-42.1

” for “Recruitment of juveniles for criminal street gang pursuant to §

18.2-46.3

” in subdivision G 12.

The 2009 amendment by c. 726 added “for an offense that would be a felony if committed by an adult” at the end of the third paragraph of subsection B.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 742 inserted “or that such student who is an adult has committed a crime and is alleged to be within the jurisdiction of the court” in the first sentence of subsection G; and substituted “student” for “juvenile” in the next-to-last paragraph of subsection G.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 384 and 410, effective March 23, 2011, are identical, and inserted “or synthetic cannabinoids” in subdivision G 6.

The 2011 amendment by c. 825, in subdivision H 3, in the first sentence, inserted “misdemeanor,” “18.2-250.1,” and “18.2-266.1,” in the third sentence, inserted “16.1-278.8:01,” and added the last two sentences.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 637, in subsection C, inserted clause (v) of the first sentence and added the last sentence, and made related and minor stylistic changes.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 746 substituted “6 (§

18.2-299

et seq.), 6.1 (§

18.2-307.1

et seq.), or 7 (§

18.2-308.1

et seq.)” for “6 (§

18.2-299

et seq.), or 7 (§

18.2-308

et seq.)” in subdivision G 1.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 674 and 719 are identical, and deleted “or synthetic cannabinoids” following “marijuana” in subdivision G 6.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 704, in subsection A, added clause (iii) and redesignated former clause (iii) as clause (iv); and made minor stylistic changes throughout the section. For applicability provision, see Editor’s note.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 281 added subdivision G 13 and made related changes.

The 2018 amendment by c. 312, in the fourth paragraph of subsection B, substituted “provided that (a)” for “The intake officer may proceed informally only if,” inserted “on more than two occasions” and added clause (b) in the second sentence; and made related changes.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 106 and 206 are identical, added subdivision G 14, and made related changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 753, in subsection B in the fourth paragraph, substituted “petition” for “complaint for 90 days” in the introductory wording of the second sentence and “deferral” for “90-day” in the last sentence; and in the sixth and seventh sentences of subdivision H 3, inserted “4.1-305 or.”

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1285 and 1286 are identical, and in subsection B, substituted “(a)” and “(b)” for “(i)” and “(ii)” in the third paragraph, “(1)” and “(2)” for “(a)” and “(b)” in the fourth paragraph, and “(A),” “(B)” and “(C)” for “(1)”, “(2)” and “(3)” in the fifth paragraph; and in subdivision H 3, in the first sentence, deleted “18.2-250.1” preceding “18.2-266” and substituted “offense, or a violation of §

18.2-250.1

, provided that” for “offense, provided.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 30, effective July 1, 2021, in subsection E, inserted “when such refusal is based solely upon a finding that no probable cause exists,” in the first sentence, inserted the second, third and fourth sentences, and added the last sentence.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 206, effective July 1, 2021, added the last sentence in subsection A.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 457, effective July 1, 2021, in subsection B in the last paragraph, substituted “restitution, the performance of community service, or on a complaint alleging that a child has committed a delinquent act other than an act that would be a felony or a Class 1 misdemeanor if committed by an adult and with the consent of the juvenile’s parent or legal guardian, referral to a youth justice diversion program established pursuant to §

16.1-309.11

” for “restitution and, the performance of community service” and inserted “or in the case of a referral to a youth justice diversion program established pursuant to §

16.1-309.11

, that any subsequent report from the youth justice diversion program alleging that the juvenile failed to comply with the youth justice diversion program’s sentence within 180 days of the sentencing date.”

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and 551, cl. 2, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and in subdivision H 3, deleted “or a violation of §

18.2-250.1

” preceding “provided that the juvenile is released” and twice deleted “or

18.2-250.1

” following “§

4.1-305

.”

Law Review.

For comment, “Jury Trials for Juvenile Delinquents in Virginia,” see 28 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 135 (1971).

For survey on legal issues involving children in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 705 (1989).

For article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 26 U. Rich. L. Rev. 797 (1992).

For an article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1345 (1998).

For 2006 survey article, “Family and Juvenile Law,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 151 (2006).

For annual survey, “A Look Back and Forward: Legislative and Regulatory Highlights for 2008 and 2009 and a Discussion of Juvenile Transfer,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 53 (2009).

For annual survey article, “Civil Practice and Procedure,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 269 (2009).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

2A M.J. Attorney & Client, § 4; 9B M.J. Infants and Juveniles, § 84; 14A M.J. Parent and Child, § 1; 14B M.J. Pleading, § 13; 16 M.J. Schools, § 22.

§ 16.1-261.
Statements made at intake or mental health screening and assessment.

Statements made by a child to the intake officer or probation officer during the intake process or during a mental health screening or assessment conducted pursuant to §

16.1-248.2

and prior to a hearing on the merits of the petition filed against the child, shall not be admissible at any stage of the proceedings.

History.

1977, c. 559; 1996, cc. 755, 914.

The 1996 amendments.

The 1996 amendments by cc. 755 and 914 are identical, and inserted “or during a mental health screening or assessment conducted pursuant to §

16.1-248.2

” following “during the intake process” near the middle of the section.

Law Review.

For 1991 survey on legal issues involving children, see 25 U. Rich. L. Rev. 773 (1991).